District of Columbia statutes.
47-4310

Summons authority.

(a)

For the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of a return; making a return where none has been made; determining the liability of a person or real property for a tax imposed under this title; determining the liability at law or in equity of a transferee or fiduciary of a person for a tax under this title; collecting tax; or inquiring into an offense connected with the administration or enforcement of a law, the Mayor may:

(1)

Summon any person to appear and produce all books, records, or other data which may be relevant or material to the inquiry;

(2)

Summon any person to give testimony under oath as may be relevant or material to the inquiry;

(3)

Summon any person to answer interrogatories under oath as may be relevant or material to the inquiry; and

(4)

Administer oaths to a person summoned.

(b)

A summons under this section shall be served by the Mayor or by a member of the Metropolitan Police Department in the same manner as a subpoena issued by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(c)

The Mayor may report to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia the failure of a person to obey a summons.

(d)

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may compel obedience of a summons under this section to the same extent as witnesses may be compelled to obey the subpoenas of the Court.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 404(b), 48 DCR 334
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(ddd), 50 DCR 896
This section is referenced in § 47-875.
D.C. Law 14-282, in subsec. (a), substituted “liability of a person or real property” for “liability of a person”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see 12(mmm) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see 12(mmm) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(lll) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(mmm) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(mmm) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Code, 2001 Ed. § 47-4310 to the Director of the Office of Tax and Revenue, see Mayor’s Order 2001-162, November 2, 2001 ( 48 DCR 10785).